Utah statutes.
77-34-4.   Duties of officials in nonemergency and emergency cases.
(1) In nonemergency situations, the appropriate official of the sending state
shall notify the appropriate official of the receiving state in writing 30
days prior to the granting of the furlough, requesting the receiving state to
investigate the circumstances of the proposed furlough plan. In these
circumstances, the receiving state shall respond in writing within 10 days
prior to the proposed furlough either accepting the inmate or stating the
reasons for the rejection.
(2)  In emergency circumstances, as defined in Subsection 77-34-3(3)(a), the
appropriate official of the sending state shall, prior to granting such
furlough, (a) verify the legitimacy of the request, and (b) upon verification,
immediately notify and secure the consent of the receiving state.
